usr/share/hunspell/ca.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: acarnissar
SFX 09 Y 84
SFX 09 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 09 r nt/_C ar
SFX 09 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 09 r da/_Y ar
SFX 09 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 09 r des/_Y ar
SFX 09 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 09 issar ís/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 09 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 09 r m/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r u/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 09 r va/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 09 r va/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 09 r res/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 09 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 09 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 09 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 09 r res/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 09 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 09 r 0/_D ar
SFX 09 ar e/_D ar
SFX 09 ar i/_D ar
SFX 09 ar em/_C ar
SFX 09 r u/_C ar
SFX 09 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 09 ar en/_C ar
SFX 09 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: acollir
SFX 0A Y 70
SFX 0A r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 0A r nt/_C ir
SFX 0A r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 0A r da/_Y ir
SFX 0A r ts/_Y ir
SFX 0A r des/_Y ir
SFX 0A ollir ullo/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ull/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ulls/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ull/_Z ir
SFX 0A r m/_Z ir
SFX 0A r u/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ullen/_Z ir
SFX 0A r a/_Z ir
SFX 0A r es/_Z ir
SFX 0A r a/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 0A r en/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir í/_Z ir
SFX 0A r res/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir í/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ren/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ré/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 0A r rà/_Z ir
SFX 0A r rem/_Z ir
SFX 0A r reu/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ran/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ria/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ries/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ria/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 0A r rien/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ulla/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ulli/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ulles/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ullis/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ulla/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ulli/_Z ir
SFX 0A r m/_Z ir
SFX 0A r u/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ullen/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ullin/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ra/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 0A r res/_Z ir
SFX 0A r sses/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ra/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 0A ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ren/_Z ir
SFX 0A r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 0A ollir ull/_C ir
SFX 0A ollir ulla/_D ir
SFX 0A ollir ulli/_D ir
SFX 0A r m/_C ir
SFX 0A r u/_C ir
SFX 0A ollir ullen/_C ir
SFX 0A ollir ullin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: acomplir
SFX 0B Y 94
SFX 0B r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 0B r nt/_C ir
SFX 0B ir ert/_v_Y ir
SFX 0B r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 0B ir erta/_Y ir
SFX 0B r da/_Y ir
SFX 0B ir erts/_Y ir
SFX 0B r ts/_Y ir
SFX 0B ir ertes/_Y ir
SFX 0B r des/_Y ir
SFX 0B ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 0B r sc/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 0B r xes/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 0B r x/_Z ir
SFX 0B r m/_Z ir
SFX 0B r u/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 0B r xen/_Z ir
SFX 0B r a/_Z ir
SFX 0B r es/_Z ir
SFX 0B r a/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 0B r en/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir í/_Z ir
SFX 0B r res/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir í/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ren/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ré/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 0B r rà/_Z ir
SFX 0B r rem/_Z ir
SFX 0B r reu/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ran/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ria/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ries/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ria/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 0B r rien/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 0B r sca/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 0B r sques/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 0B r sca/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 0B r m/_Z ir
SFX 0B r guem/_Z ir
SFX 0B r u/_Z ir
SFX 0B r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 0B r squen/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ra/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 0B r res/_Z ir
SFX 0B r sses/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ra/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ren/_Z ir
SFX 0B r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 0B ir eix/_C ir
SFX 0B r x/_C ir
SFX 0B ir esca/_D ir
SFX 0B r sca/_D ir
SFX 0B ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 0B ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 0B r m/_C ir
SFX 0B r guem/_C ir
SFX 0B r u/_C ir
SFX 0B ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 0B r squen/_C ir
SFX 0B ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 0B ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: acréixer
SFX 0C Y 91
SFX 0C r r/_v_C_Y er
SFX 0C éixer eixent/_C er
SFX 0C éixer escut/_v_Y er
SFX 0C éixer escuda/_Y er
SFX 0C éixer escuts/_Y er
SFX 0C éixer escudes/_Y er
SFX 0C éixer eixo/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esc/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixes/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eix/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixen/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixia/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixies/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixia/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixíem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixíeu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixien/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixí/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquí/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeres/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqueres/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixé/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqué/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixérem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquérem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixéreu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquéreu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeren/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqueren/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeré/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeràs/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixerà/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixerem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixereu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeran/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeria/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeries/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeria/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeríem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeríeu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixerien/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esca/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqui/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixi/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esques/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquis/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixis/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esca/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqui/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixi/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixeu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqueu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquen/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquin/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixin/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixés/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqués/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquera/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixessis/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquessis/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqueres/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquesses/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixés/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqués/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquera/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixéssim/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquéssim/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquérem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquéssem/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixéssiu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquéssiu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquéreu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquésseu/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eixessin/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquessin/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esqueren/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer esquessen/_Z er
SFX 0C éixer eix/_C er
SFX 0C éixer esca/_D er
SFX 0C éixer esqui/_D er
SFX 0C éixer eixi/_D er
SFX 0C éixer eixem/_C er
SFX 0C éixer esquem/_C er
SFX 0C éixer eixeu/_C er
SFX 0C éixer esquen/_C er
SFX 0C éixer esquin/_C er
SFX 0C éixer eixin/_C er
